Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 60
OIL AND GAS CONSERVATION

Section

34-60-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Oil and Gas Conservation Act".

Source:

L. 51:

p. 662, § 16.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(15).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-19.

34-60-102. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be in the public interest and the commission is directed to:

Regulate the development and production of the natural resources of oil and gas in the state of Colorado in a manner that protects public health, safety, and welfare, including protection of the environment and wildlife resources;

Protect the public and private interests against waste in the production and utilization of oil and gas;

Safeguard, protect, and enforce the coequal and correlative rights of owners and producers in a common source or pool of oil and gas to the end that each such owner and producer in a common pool or source of supply of oil and gas may obtain a just and equitable share of production therefrom; and

Plan and manage oil and gas operations in a manner that balances development with wildlife conservation in recognition of the state's obligation to protect wildlife resources and the hunting, fishing, and recreation traditions they support, which are an important part of Colorado's economy and culture. Pursuant to section 33-1-101, C.R.S., it is the policy of the state of Colorado that wildlife and their environment are to be protected, preserved, enhanced, and managed for the use, benefit, and enjoyment of the people of this state and its visitors.

It is neither the intent nor the purpose of this article 60 to require or permit the proration or distribution of the production of oil and gas among the fields and pools of Colorado on the basis of market demand. It is the intent and purpose of this article 60 to permit each oil and gas pool in Colorado to produce up to its maximum efficient rate of production, subject to the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, the environment, and wildlife resources and the prevention of waste as set forth in section 34-60-106 (2.5) and (3)(a), and subject further to the enforcement and protection of the coequal and correlative rights of the owners and producers of a common source of oil and gas, so that each common owner and producer may obtain a just and equitable share of production from the common source.

It is further declared to be in the public interest to assure that producers and consumers of natural gas are afforded the protection and benefits of those laws and regulations of the United States which affect the price and allocation of natural gas and crude oil, including the federal "Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978", 15 U.S.C. sec. 3301, and particularly that the oil and gas conservation commission, established by section 34-60-104, be empowered to exercise such powers and authorities as may be delegated to it by the laws or regulations of the United States, including said "Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978", and, in the exercise of such powers and authorities, to make such rules and regulations and to execute such agreements and waivers as are reasonably required to implement such power and authority.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 656, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-22.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1319, § 1, effective February 16.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1978, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1357, § 2, effective May 29; (1) amended, p. 1328, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(I), and (1)(b) amended, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 506, § 6, effective April 16.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by House Bill 07-1341 and House Bill 07-1298 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 320, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

34-60-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 60, unless the context otherwise requires:

"And" includes the word "or" and the use of the word "or" includes the word "and". The use of the plural includes the singular and the use of the singular includes the plural.

"Commission" means the oil and gas conservation commission.

"Common source of supply" is synonymous with "pool" as defined in this section.

"Correlative rights" means that each owner and producer in a common pool or source of supply of oil and gas shall have an equal opportunity to obtain and produce his just and equitable share of the oil and gas underlying such pool or source of supply.

(4.3) "Division of parks and wildlife" means the division of parks and wildlife identified in article 9 of title 33, C.R.S.

(4.5) "Exploration and production waste" means those wastes that are generated during the drilling of and production from oil and gas wells or during primary field operations and that are exempt from regulation as hazardous wastes under subtitle c of the federal "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976", 42 U.S.C. sec. 6901 to 6934, as amended.

"Gas" means all natural gases and all hydrocarbons not defined in this section as oil.

(5.3) "Local government" means, except with regard to section 34-60-104 (2)(a)(I), a:

Municipality or city and county within whose boundaries an oil and gas location is sited or proposed to be sited; or

County, if an oil and gas location is sited or proposed to be sited within the boundaries of the county but is not located within a municipality or city and county.

(5.5) "Minimize adverse impacts" means, to the extent necessary and reasonable to protect public health, safety, and welfare, the environment, and wildlife resources, to:

Avoid adverse impacts from oil and gas operations; and

Minimize and mitigate the extent and severity of those impacts that cannot be avoided.

"Oil" means crude petroleum oil and any other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravities, which are produced at the well in liquid form by ordinary production methods, and which are not the result of condensation of gas before or after it leaves the reservoir.

(6.2) "Oil and gas facility" means equipment or improvements used or installed at an oil and gas location for the exploration, production, withdrawal, treatment, or processing of crude oil, condensate, exploration and production waste, or gas.

(6.4) "Oil and gas location" means a definable area where an oil and gas operator has disturbed or intends to disturb the land surface in order to locate an oil and gas facility.

(6.5) "Oil and gas operations" means exploration for oil and gas, including the conduct of seismic operations and the drilling of test bores; the siting, drilling, deepening, recompletion, reworking, or abandonment of an oil and gas well, underground injection well, or gas storage well; production operations related to any such well including the installation of flow lines and gathering systems; the generation, transportation, storage, treatment, or disposal of exploration and production wastes; and any construction, site preparation, or reclamation activities associated with such operations.

(6.8) "Operator" means any person who exercises the right to control the conduct of oil and gas operations.

"Owner" means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from a pool and to appropriate the oil or gas he produces therefrom either for himself or others or for himself and others, including the owner of a well capable of producing oil or gas, or both.

(7.1) "Parks and wildlife commission" means the parks and wildlife commission created in section 33-9-101, C.R.S.

(7.5) "Permit" means any permit, sundry notice, notice of intention, or other approval, including any conditions of approval, which is granted, issued, or approved by the commission.

"Person" means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, or other representative of any kind, and includes any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or any governmental subdivision thereof.

"Pool" means an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of oil or gas, or both. Each zone of a general structure, which zone is completely separated from any other zone in the structure, is covered by the word "pool" as used in this article.

"Producer" means the owner of a well capable of producing oil or gas, or both.

(10.5) "Surface owner" means any person owning all or part of the surface of land upon which oil and gas operations are conducted, as shown by the tax records of the county in which the tract of land is situated, or any person with such rights under a recorded contract to purchase.

(10.7) "Underground natural gas storage cavern" means a facility that stored natural gas in an underground cavern or abandoned mine on or before January 1, 2000. An underground natural gas storage cavern includes all surface or subsurface rights and appurtenances associated with the underground injection, storage, and withdrawal of natural gas, but does not include any compressor stations or pipeline facilities subject to regulation by the public utilities commission or the United States department of transportation.

"Waste", as applied to gas:

Includes the escape, blowing, or releasing, directly or indirectly into the open air, of gas from wells productive of gas only, or gas in an excessive or unreasonable amount from wells producing oil or both oil and gas; and the production of gas in quantities or in such manner as unreasonably reduces reservoir pressure or, subject to subsection (11)(b) of this section, unreasonably diminishes the quantity of oil or gas that ultimately may be produced; excepting gas that is reasonably necessary in the drilling, completing, testing, and in furnishing power for the production of wells; and

Does not include the nonproduction of gas from a formation if necessary to protect public health, safety, and welfare, the environment, or wildlife resources as determined by the commission.

"Waste", as applied to oil:

Includes underground waste; inefficient, excessive, or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy, including gas energy and water drive; surface waste; open-pit storage; and waste incident to the production of oil in excess of the producer's aboveground storage facilities and lease and contractual requirements, but excluding storage, other than open-pit storage, reasonably necessary for building up or maintaining crude stocks and products of crude stocks for consumption, use, and sale; and

Does not include the nonproduction of oil from a formation if necessary to protect public health, safety, and welfare, the environment, or wildlife resources as determined by the commission.

"Waste", in addition to the meanings as set forth in subsections (11) and (12) of this section:

Means, subject to subsection (13)(b) of this section:

Physical waste, as that term is generally understood in the oil and gas industry;

The locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner that causes or tends to cause reduction in quantity of oil or gas ultimately recoverable from a pool under prudent and proper operations or that causes or tends to cause unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas; and

Abuse of the correlative rights of any owner in a pool due to nonuniform, disproportionate, unratable, or excessive withdrawals of oil or gas from the pool, causing reasonably avoidable drainage between tracts of land or resulting in one or more producers or owners in the pool producing more than an equitable share of the oil or gas from the pool; and

Does not include the nonproduction of oil or gas from a formation if necessary to protect public health, safety, and welfare, the environment, or wildlife resources as determined by the commission.

Repealed.

"Wildlife resources" means fish, wildlife, and their aquatic and terrestrial habitats.

Source:

L. 51:

pp. 652, 653, §§ 3, 4, 5.

CSA:

C. 118, §§ 68(3), 68(4), 68(5).

L. 52:

p. 132, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-3.

L. 55:

p. 649, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-3.

L. 94:

(4.5), (6.5), (6.8), (7.5), and (10.5) added, p. 1979, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 2001:

(10.7) added, p. 1303, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2007:

(4.3), (5.5), (14), and (15) added, p. 1329, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(4.3) and (14) amended and (7.1) added, (SB 11-208), ch. 293, p. 1394, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(7.1) amended and (14) repealed, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1235, § 89, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

IP, (5.5), (11), (12), and (13) amended and (5.3), (6.2), and (6.4) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 506, § 7, effective April 16.

Editor's note:

Subsection (7.1) was numbered as (1.5) in Senate Bill 11-208 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act enacting subsections (4.5), (6.5), (6.8), (7.5), and (10.5), see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-104. Oil and gas conservation commission - report - publication - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 51:

p. 651, § 2.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(2).

L. 52:

p. 130, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-2.

L. 55:

p. 648, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-2.

L. 64:

p. 158, § 109.

L. 68:

p. 130, § 146.

L. 72:

p. 550, § 15.

L. 82:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended, p. 358, § 20, effective April 30.

L. 85:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1128, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2)(b) amended, p. 912, § 26, effective June 15.

L. 90:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1545, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1415, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1979, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 754, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1358, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2012:

(2)(b) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1235, § 90, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

(1), (2)(a)(I), and (2)(a)(II) amended, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 508, § 8, effective April 16.

34-60-104.3. Oil and gas conservation commission - report - publication.

There is created, in the department of natural resources, the oil and gas conservation commission. The oil and gas conservation commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The commission consists of seven members, five of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. The executive director of the department of natural resources and the executive director of the department of public health and environment, or the executive directors' designees, are ex officio nonvoting members. A majority of the voting commissioners constitutes a quorum for the transaction of its business.

Each appointed commissioner must be a qualified elector of this state. Each appointed commissioner, before entering upon the duties of office, shall take the constitutional oath of office. Excluding the executive directors from consideration, no more than three members of the commission may be members of the same political party. To the extent possible, consistent with this subsection (2), the members shall be appointed taking into account the need for geographical representation of areas of the state with high levels of current or anticipated oil and gas activity or employment. The appointed members of the commission shall devote their entire time to the duties of their offices to the exclusion of any other employment and are entitled to receive compensation as designated by law.

One appointed member must be an individual with substantial experience in the oil and gas industry; one appointed member must have substantial expertise in planning or land use; one appointed member must have formal training or substantial experience in environmental protection, wildlife protection, or reclamation; one appointed member must have professional experience demonstrating an ability to contribute to the commission's body of expertise that will aid the commission in making sound, balanced decisions; and one appointed member must have formal training or substantial experience in public health.

No person may be appointed to serve on the commission or hold the office of commissioner if the person has a conflict of interest with oil and gas development in Colorado. Examples of conflicts of interest include being registered as a lobbyist at the local or state levels, serving in the general assembly within the prior three years, or serving in an official capacity with an entity that educates or advocates for or against oil and gas activity. This subsection (2)(d) shall be construed reasonably with the objective of disqualifying from the commission any person who might have an immediate conflict of interest or who may not be able to make balanced decisions about oil and gas regulation in Colorado. A person who has worked with or for an energy or environmental entity need not be disqualified if the person's experience shows subject matter knowledge coupled with an ability to render informed, thorough, and balanced decision-making.

Members of the commission shall be appointed for terms of four years each; except that the initial terms of two members are two years. The governor shall designate one member of the commission as chair of the commission. The chair shall delegate roles and responsibilities to commissioners and the director. The governor may at any time remove any appointed member of the commission, and by appointment the governor shall fill any vacancy on the commission. In case one or more vacancies occur on the same day, the governor shall designate the order of filling vacancies.

The commission shall report to the executive director of the department of natural resources at such times and on such matters as the executive director may require.

Publications of the commission circulated in quantity outside the executive branch are subject to the approval and control of the executive director of the department of natural resources.

This section takes effect on the earlier of July 1, 2020, or the date on which all rules required to be adopted by section 34-60-106 (2.5)(a), (11)(c), and (19) have become effective. The director shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing of the date on which the condition specified in this subsection (5) has occurred by e-mailing the notice to revisorofstatutes.ga@state.co.us.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 509, § 9, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3410, § 165, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

As of July 1, 2020, the revisor of statutes has not received the notice referred to in subsection (5), therefore this section takes effect July 1, 2020, as set forth in subsection (5).

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

34-60-104.5. Director of commission - duties.

Pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, the executive director of the department of natural resources shall appoint a director of the commission who must possess such qualifications as may be established by the executive director, the commission, and the state personnel board. The director of the commission is a type 1 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The director of the commission shall:

Administer the provisions of this article;

Enforce the rules and regulations adopted by the commission;

Implement and administer orders issued by the commission;

Appoint, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, such clerical and professional staff and consultants as may be necessary for the efficient and effective operation of the commission, including at least one and up to two deputy directors; and

Exercise general supervisory control over the staff; and

Perform such other functions as may be assigned to him by the commission, including that of appointment as a hearing officer in accordance with section 34-60-106.

Upon receipt of request for technical review filed pursuant to section 29-20-104 (3)(a), the director of the commission shall appoint technical review board members. The membership of the technical review board must include subject matter experts in local land use planning and oil and gas exploration and production and may include subject matter experts in environmental sciences, public health sciences, or other disciplines relevant to the disputed issues, as determined by the director. The technical review board shall conduct a technical review of the preliminary or final siting determination pursuant to the criteria specified in subsection (3)(b) of this section and, at its discretion, may meet to confer informally with the parties. The technical review must be completed by issuance of a report within sixty days after the director appoints the experts.

A technical review:

Must address the issues in dispute as identified by the operator and the local government, which may include impacts to the recovery of the resource by the preliminary or final siting determination of the local government; whether the local government's determination would require technologies that are not available or are impracticable given the context of the permit application; and whether the operator is proposing to use best management practices; and

Must not address the economic effects of the preliminary or final determination and must result in the issuance of a report.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 934, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 94:

(2)(d) amended, p. 1980, § 5, effective June 2.

L. 2019:

(2)(d) amended and (3) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 510, § 10, effective April 16.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3410, § 166, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (2)(d), see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

(2) For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

34-60-105. Powers of commission.

The commission has jurisdiction over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to enforce this article 60, the power to make and enforce rules and orders pursuant to this article 60, and to do whatever may reasonably be necessary to carry out this article 60.

Any delegation of authority to any other state officer, board, or commission to administer any other laws of this state relating to the conservation of oil or gas, or either of them, is hereby rescinded and withdrawn, and that authority is unqualifiedly conferred upon the commission, as provided in this section; except that, as further specified in section 34-60-131, nothing in this article 60 alters, impairs, or negates the authority of:

The air quality control commission to regulate, pursuant to article 7 of title 25, the emission of air pollutants from oil and gas operations;

The water quality control commission to regulate, pursuant to article 8 of title 25, the discharge of water pollutants from oil and gas operations;

The state board of health to regulate, pursuant to section 25-11-104, the disposal of naturally occurring radioactive materials and technologically enhanced naturally occurring radioactive materials from oil and gas operations;

The solid and hazardous waste commission to:

Regulate, pursuant to article 15 of title 25, the disposal of hazardous waste from oil and gas operations; or

Regulate, pursuant to section 30-20-109 (1.5), the disposal of exploration and production waste from oil and gas operations; and

A local government to regulate oil and gas operations pursuant to section 29-20-104.

Any person, or the attorney general on behalf of the state, may apply for a hearing before the commission, or the commission may initiate proceedings, upon any question relating to the administration of this article 60, and jurisdiction is conferred upon the commission to hear and determine the question and enter its rule or order with respect to the question.

Repealed.

The attorney general is the legal advisor of the commission, and it is his or her duty to represent the commission in all court proceedings and in all proceedings before it and in any proceedings to which the commission may be a party before any department of the federal government.

Except as specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section, nothing in this article 60 authorizes the state or its local governments, including the commission, boards of county commissioners, and municipalities, to regulate the activities of:

Federally recognized Indian tribes, their political subdivisions, or tribally controlled affiliates, undertaken or to be undertaken with respect to mineral evaluation, exploration, or development on lands within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation located within the state; or

Third parties, undertaken or to be undertaken with respect to mineral evaluation, exploration, or development on Indian trust lands within the exterior boundaries of an Indian reservation located within the state.

Regulation by the state or its local governments, including the commission, boards of county commissioners, and municipalities, applicable to non-Indians conducting oil and gas operations on lands within the exterior boundaries of the Southern Ute Indian reservation may apply to lands where both the surface and the oil and gas estates are owned in fee by a person other than the Southern Ute Indian tribe, regardless of whether the lands are communitized or pooled with Indian mineral lands.

Nothing in this article 60 alters the authority for the regulation of air pollution on the Southern Ute Indian reservation as set forth in article 62 of title 24 and part 13 of article 7 of title 25.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 655, § 7.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(7).

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-5.

L. 81:

(2) repealed, p. 1690, § 3, effective May 21.

L. 2016:

(3) amended, (HB 16-1094), ch. 94, p. 268, § 18, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1) amended and (4) added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 511, § 11, effective April 16.